Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General
§ 21-3-131.
School bus standards; operators; vehicle operation; liability limited.

Each district shall establish and maintain minimum standards for persons involved in the operation of school buses, including:

Developing a written plan for the selection, training and supervision of persons whose duties involve the transporting of pupils;

Requiring each applicant for a position which duties involve the transporting of pupils to complete and submit an application form that includes a personal and occupational history;

Completing a check of the successful applicant’s driving record;

Ensuring the successful applicant has on file with the district a copy of the medical examiner’s certificate required by the United States department of transportation, federal motor carrier safety regulations, 49 C.F.R. Part 391.41;

Requiring annual training consisting of not less than six (6) hours for persons whose duties involve the operation of school buses.

Each district shall establish and maintain minimum standards for the operation of school buses, including:

All school buses shall undergo a safety inspection not less than two (2) times each school year, with one (1) inspection conducted by a person not employed by the school district. A copy of the inspection reports shall be filed with the local school district;

School bus operators shall perform a daily pre-trip inspection of their vehicles and report promptly any defect or deficiency discovered that may affect the safety of the vehicle’s operation or result in its mechanical breakdown. Documentation of the inspections shall be submitted weekly and retained on file with the school district for a period of one (1) year;

Operators of school buses equipped with lap belts shall wear a properly secured lap belt at all times the vehicle is in motion;

Passengers in type A school buses equipped with factory installed lap belts shall wear a properly secured lap belt at all times the vehicle is in motion;

At least twice during each school year the driver of each school bus shall hold an emergency evacuation drill. Proper documentation for each drill shall be maintained on file with the school district;

School bus routing and seating plans shall be coordinated to eliminate standing passengers or exceeding the manufacturer’s rating capacity for the school bus;

School buses shall operate with lighted headlamps at all times the vehicle is in motion;

The service door of the school bus shall remain closed at all times the vehicle is in motion;

Any accident involving a school bus which is required to be reported under W.S.

31-5-1106

shall also be reported to the state department of education on forms approved by the department;

Effective school year 2016-2017, and each school year thereafter, all school buses transporting students to and from school and to and from student activities, as defined under W.S. 21-13-320(b)(i) and (ii), shall be equipped with an external video system and may be equipped with an internal video system. Equipment specifications shall be prescribed by rule and regulation of the department. Recordings or images from a video system installed under this paragraph shall not be a public record under the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

. Recordings or images may be entered into evidence for a violation of W.S. 31-5-507(a) as provided in W.S. 31-5-507(e) and may be discoverable for other criminal actions. Recordings or images made from a video system under this paragraph shall be destroyed within one (1) year of the date the recording was made.

Evidence of a person’s failure to wear a lap or seat belt on a school bus if required under state or federal law or the failure of a school bus driver to require a passenger to wear a lap or seat belt as required under W.S. 31-5-1402(a), shall not be admissible in any civil action or for the purposes of W.S. 31-5-1402(a).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 112, § 1; 2010, ch. 77, § 1; 2014 ch. 41, § 1, effective March 7, 2014; 2019 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (c).

The 2014 amendment,

added (b)(x).

Laws 2014, ch. 41, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2014.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(x), added the third, fourth, and fifth sentences.

§ 21-3-132.
Possession of firearms on school property.

The board of trustees in each school district may adopt rules and regulations, in consultation with local law enforcement, to allow the possession of firearms by employees possessing a valid concealed carry permit under W.S.

6-8-104

on or in any property or facility owned or leased by the school district. Employees of a school district who hold a valid concealed carry permit issued under W.S.

6-8-104

may carry a concealed firearm on or into school facilities or other areas designated by the board of trustees, provided the employing school district has adopted rules and regulations that allow possession of firearms on school property and the employee has received approval by the board of trustees as required by this section.

For purposes of this section, “employee” means any person employed by a school district, including but not limited to, superintendents, assistant superintendents, principals, assistant principals, teachers, guidance counselors, librarians, teacher’s aids, coaches, business managers, secretaries or administrative assistants, janitors, bus drivers or other employees of a school district.

The rules required by subsection (a) of this section shall at a minimum:

Establish an application and approval process for employees possessing a valid concealed carry permit under W.S.

6-8-104

to carry a firearm on school property;

Require any person carrying a firearm pursuant to this section to maintain the firearm on his person at all times or in a concealed biometric container or lock box within the direct control of the individual at all times;

Establish ongoing training requirements, curricula and instructor qualifications, subject to approval by local law enforcement, including:

An initial course of training comprised of not less than sixteen (16) hours of live fire handgun training, and eight (8) hours of scenario based training using nonlethal training, firearms and ammunition; and

Annual firearm qualification and documented recurrent training of not less than twelve (12) hours with an approved instructor.

Provide a process for the revocation or suspension of the authorization under this section for an employee to carry a firearm on school property.

The board of trustees in any school district may waive all or part of the training requirements of subsection (c) of this section for isolated rural schools and employees in those schools.

The superintendent of the district shall notify the parents and guardians of students attending school in the district of the ability of employees to carry firearms and the rules and regulations governing possession.

The superintendent of the district shall notify all law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the area of the location and names of all employees who receive permission to carry firearms from the district’s board of trustees. The identities of the employees who receive permission to carry firearms from the district’s board of trustees shall be confidential and are not public records for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

Nothing in this section shall authorize an employee to carry a firearm, concealed or otherwise, on or into any facility or other school district property without the express approval of the board of trustees and notification of parties as required by this section.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a student of a school district to carry a firearm, concealed or otherwise, on or into any facility of a school district.

Any rules and regulations adopted under this section shall only apply to persons who are employees, as defined in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2017 ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 32, § 1, effective February 15, 2019.

Editor's notes.—

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), substituted "by" for "under contract with the board of trustees of" following "employed," deleted ", volunteers" following "bus drivers," and substituted "of" for "with" preceding "a school district."

Laws 2019, ch. 32, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 209, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 21-3-133.
Child sexual abuse education, prevention and response.

A school district that has not already taken similar action is authorized to take the following actions relating to child sexual abuse education, prevention and response:

Provide parents with information on the warning signs of child sexual abuse and any available resources for education, prevention and response;

Provide training to teachers and other school district employees, including:

Instructional methods relating to the provisions of W.S.

21-9-104

;

Child abuse or neglect reporting requirements specified in W.S.

14-3-205

;

Methods to respond to a student’s disclosure of sexual abuse in a supportive and appropriate manner.

Consult with federal, state and local entities and community based organizations, including the child welfare information gateway internet website maintained by the United States department of health and human services, to identify evidence based tools and programs to prevent and respond to child sexual abuse;

Develop community based strategies to promote education, collaboration and accountability among persons and entities who are responsible for child sexual abuse education, prevention and response, including parents and guardians, law enforcement, judicial officers, health care providers and other members of the community;

Coordinate with the local child protection team in accordance with W.S. 14-3-212(b)(ii);

Accept funds from private and public sources for programs relating to this section.

History.

2018 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 133, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.